New York, session 2025-2026, A2473.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The closing paragraph of section 125.05 of the penal law, 2 as amended by chapter 1 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 "Person," when referring to the victim of a homicide, means a human 5 being who has been born and is alive. This provision shall be known as 6 "Mya's law". 7 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04589-01-5